Mississippi, session 2026, HB1335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 5-1-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2029, this section shall read as follows:] 5-1-41.  Beginning with the 1986 Regular Session of the Legislature of the State of Mississippi, each Senator and Representative of the Legislature shall receive as compensation at each regular session the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and the mileage allowance provided by Section 25-3-41, for each mile of the distance by the most direct route usually traveled in coming to and returning from the place where the Legislature sits. Beginning on April 16, 1997, each Senator and Representative shall receive for attending each extraordinary session or called session the sum of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per day and mileage at the same rate as per regular session.  In addition to the above, beginning on April 16, 1997, each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor shall receive the sum of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month for expenses incidental to his office for every full month of his term, except any month or major fraction thereof when the Legislature is convened in regular or extraordinary session; and payments shall be made to each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor by the State Treasurer between the first and tenth day of each month following the month for which the payments are due. [From and after January 1, 2029, this section shall read as follows:] 5-1-41.  * * *Beginning with the 1986 Regular Session of the Legislature of the State of Mississippi, each Each Senator and Representative of the Legislature shall receive as compensation * * *at each regular session the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the annual salary of the Governor of the State of Mississippi as established in Section 25-3-31 and the mileage allowance provided by Section 25-3-41, for each mile of the distance by the most direct route usually traveled in coming to and returning from the place where the Legislature sits.  * * *Beginning on April 16, 1997, each Each Senator and Representative shall receive for attending each extraordinary session or called session the sum of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per day and mileage at the same rate as per regular session.  In addition to the above, * * * beginning on April 16, 1997, each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor shall receive the sum of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month for expenses incidental to his or her office for every full month of his or her term, except any month or major fraction thereof when the Legislature is convened in regular or extraordinary session; and payments shall be made to each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor by the State Treasurer between the first and tenth day of each month following the month for which the payments are due. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.